District of Columbia statutes.
3-2304.03

Repealed

Problems beyond psychologist’s competence; medical problems; restrictions on practice

Repealed.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1104(h), 33 DCR 729
1981 Ed., §§ 2-1704.1 to 2-1704.18.